Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Patrol Officers in Certain Counties, Bordering on Gulf of Mexico, Bordering on State of Alabama, or Bordering on Mississippi River

§ 45-7-41.
Employment of patrol officers.

The board of supervisors of any county:

Bordering on the Gulf of Mexico, having created a county port authority under the provisions of Sections 59-9-1 through 59-9-85, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

Bordering on the State of Alabama, having a land area of seven hundred twenty-one (721) square miles, having a population in excess of sixty-seven thousand (67,000) in the 1960 federal decennial census, wherein there is located a state-supported mental institution, and wherein U. S. Highways 80 and 45 intersect; may employ not more than five (5) county patrol officers.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Mississippi River and having an area of four hundred forty-eight (448) square miles with a population not in excess of thirty-two thousand five hundred (32,500), and a municipality therein with a population in excess of twenty-two thousand (22,000) and of not more than twenty-three thousand (23,000), all in accordance with the federal census of 1950, may employ not more than two (2) county patrol officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 216, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 206; Laws, 1966, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 292; Laws, 1976, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1976).

§ 45-7-43.
Duties of patrol officers.

Those county patrol officers who are employed pursuant to the authority granted in Section 45-7-41 shall exercise the same duties and have the same power and authority as provided for under Section 45-7-3.

The duties of such county patrol officers shall be performed only in the county in which employed. Such county patrol officers shall not be authorized to operate county patrol vehicles outside of the limits of such county, except in case of emergency when the public safety and welfare shall require the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 216, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 206; Laws, 1966, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 292, eff from and after passage (approved June 21, 1968).

§ 45-7-45.
Compensation; transportation; uniforms; equipment.

The board of supervisors of any county specified in subsection (1) of Section 45-7-41 may pay the county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per month for any one (1) county; in no case shall any one (1) patrol officer receive in excess of Nine Hundred Fifty Dollars ($950.00) per month. Said board may also pay a reimbursement for expenses in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month for any one (1) county; in no case shall any one (1) patrol officer receive in excess of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county specified in subsection (2) of Section 45-7-41 may pay the county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month for any one (1) county; in no case shall any one (1) patrol officer receive in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county specified in Section 45-7-41 may furnish said patrol officers means of transportation or reimburse them for their actual and proven transportation expenses, may furnish suitable uniforms, and may acquire radio transmitting and receiving equipment, and such other equipment as may be required for use by said patrol officers in the proper performance of their duties. All salaries and expenses provided for herein shall be paid from the general fund of said county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 216, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 206; Laws, 1966, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 292; Laws, 1972, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 338, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 557, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1980).

§ 45-7-47.
Powers to be additional and supplemental.

The power and authority granted in Sections 45-7-41 through 45-7-45 shall be additional and supplemental to Sections 45-7-1 and 45-7-5.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8063.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 216, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 206; Laws, 1966, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 292, eff from and after passage (approved June 21, 1968).